North Dakota, session 69, HB1008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the public
service commission for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the public service commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $11,026,304 $1,148,083 $12,174,387
New and vacant FTE pool 0 265,735 265,735
Operating expenses 2,205,487 547,167 2,752,654
Capital assets 25,000 205,000 230,000
Grants 20,000 0 20,000
Abandoned mined lands contractual 6,000,000 0 6,000,000
services
Rail rate complaint case 900,000 0 900,000
Railroad safety program 672,206 41,024 713,230
Specialized legal services 420,000 (19,834) 400,166
Total all funds $21,268,997 $2,187,175 $23,456,172
Less other funds 13,779,645 454,823 14,234,468
Total general fund $7,489,352 $1,732,352 $9,221,704
Full-time equivalent positions 45.00 0.00 45.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Drone imaging technology $5,580 $149,420 $155,000
Federal intervention funding 250,000 0 250,000
Total $255,580 $149,420 $405,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The public
service commission may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages and railroad safety program line items in
accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved
by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. RAIL RATE COMPLAINT CASE - LOAN AUTHORIZATION. The public service
commission may obtain a loan from the Bank of North Dakota for costs associated with a rail rate

H. B. NO. 1008 - PAGE 2
complaint case. The loan may not exceed $900,000, and the interest rate associated with the loan must
be the prevailing interest rate charged to North Dakota governmental entities. The public service
commission shall repay the loan from amounts available from damages or proceeds received, net of
legal fees, from a successful outcome of a rail complaint case. If moneys anticipated to be available on
June 30, 2027, are not sufficient to repay the loan, the public service commission may request a
deficiency appropriation from the legislative assembly to repay the loan.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 49-01-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-01-05. Salary of commissioners.
The annual salary of a commissioner is one hundred thirty thousand dollars through June 30, 2024,
and one hundred thirty-five thousand two hundredone hundred thirty-nine thousand two hundred fifty-
six dollars through June 30, 2026, and one hundred forty-three thousand four hundred thirty-four dollars
thereafter. All fees received or charged by any commissioner for any act or service rendered in any
official capacity must be accounted for and paid over by the commissioner monthly to the state
treasurer and must be credited to the general fund of the state.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 57-43.2-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-43.2-19. Transfer, deposit, and distribution of funds.
All taxes, license fees, penalties, and interest collected under this chapter must be transferred to
the state treasurer who shall deposit moneys in a highway tax distribution fund, except all special fuels
excise taxes collected on sales of diesel fuel to a railroad under section 57-43.2-03 of up to three
hundred thirty-two thousand three hundred twenty-seventhree hundred fifty-two thousand eight hundred
ninety-two dollars per year must be transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit the moneys in
the rail safety fund. The highway tax distribution fund must be distributed in the manner as prescribed
by section 54-27-19.

H. B. NO. 1008 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1008.
House Vote: Yeas 80 Nays 10 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State